Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1934
Secretary of State; rules and regulations; adopt; forms.

The secretary shall adopt and promulgate any rules and regulations and provide such forms as are necessary to carry out sections 81-1901 to 81-1936.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 34.